Utah statutes.
63H-5-110.   Lease of rails or equipment from Department of Transportation and Division of Parks and Recreation.

The Department of Transportation and the Division of Parks and Recreation may jointly lease the rails, bed, right-of-way, and related property for the operation of a scenic and historic railroad in and around Weber and Box Elder Counties, for not more than $1 per year to the authority.

